Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 22

County Fishing Lakes and Recreation Grounds

11-22-101. Lakes — Counties may acquire suitable areas.

The legislative body of any county is authorized to acquire, by gift or purchase, any natural lakes or lands suitable for the construction of lakes, and to hold fee simple title in the name of the county.

Acts 1937, ch. 219, §§ 1, 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5201.8 (Williams, §§ 5201.9, 5201.10); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-801; Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by that act shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

Cross-References. Cooperation for park purposes, § 11-3-104.

Power and use of eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 1.

Law Reviews.

Property Rights vs. Public Use: Analyzing Tennessee's Response to Kelo Eminent Domain Ruling (Scott Griswold), 43 Tenn B.J. 14 (2007).